customize_system/packages/guadalinex-openoffice2.1-conf/guadalinex-openoffice2.1-conf-0.1/gcs/conffiles_skel/opt/openoffice.org2.1/share/dict/ooo/es_ES.aff
SFX W   0     ías         olver
SFX W   0     ías         or[cd]er
SFX W   ir    drías       alir
SFX W   0     ías         e[bdgmrtñ]ir
SFX W   ecir  irías       ecir
SFX W   ír    irías       [eo]ír
SFX W   0     ías         enchir
SFX W   0     ías         endir
SFX W   ir    drías       enir
SFX W   0     ías         e[ns]tir
SFX W   0     ías         er[ntv]ir
SFX W   0     ías         eunir
SFX W   0     ías         [io]rir
SFX W   0     ías         ormir
SFX W   0     ías         ucir
SFX W   0     ías         [üu]ir
SFX W   0     ías         ullir
SFX W   0     ías         uñir
SFX W   0     íamos       ar
SFX W   er    ríamos      aber
SFX W   0     íamos       [^fh]acer
SFX W   cer   ríamos      [fh]acer
SFX W   er    dríamos     aler
SFX W   0     íamos       e[cd]er
SFX W   0     íamos       [aeo]er
SFX W   0     íamos       ender
SFX W   er    dríamos     [eo]ner
SFX W   0     íamos       er[dnt]er
SFX W   er    ríamos      erer
SFX W   0     íamos       o[clv]er
SFX W   er    ríamos      oder
SFX W   0     íamos       olver
SFX W   0     íamos       or[cd]er
SFX W   ir    dríamos     alir
SFX W   0     íamos       e[bdgmrtñ]ir
SFX W   ecir  iríamos     ecir
SFX W   ír    iríamos     [eo]ír
SFX W   0     íamos       enchir
SFX W   0     íamos       endir
SFX W   ir    dríamos     enir
SFX W   0     íamos       e[ns]tir
SFX W   0     íamos       er[ntv]ir
SFX W   0     íamos       eunir
SFX W   0     íamos       [io]rir
SFX W   0     íamos       ormir
SFX W   0     íamos       ucir
SFX W   0     íamos       [üu]ir
SFX W   0     íamos       ullir
SFX W   0     íamos       uñir
SFX W   0     íais        ar
SFX W   er    ríais       aber
SFX W   0     íais        [^fh]acer
SFX W   cer   ríais       [fh]acer
SFX W   er    dríais      aler
SFX W   0     íais        [aeo]er
SFX W   0     íais        e[cd]er
SFX W   0     íais        ender
SFX W   er    dríais      [eo]ner
SFX W   0     íais        er[dnt]er
SFX W   er    ríais       erer
SFX W   0     íais        o[clv]er
SFX W   er    ríais       oder
SFX W   0     íais        olver
SFX W   0     íais        or[cd]er
SFX W   ir    dríais      alir
SFX W   0     íais        e[bdgmrtñ]ir
SFX W   ecir  iríais      ecir
SFX W   ír    iríais      [eo]ír
SFX W   0     íais        enchir
SFX W   0     íais        endir
SFX W   ir    dríais      enir
SFX W   0     íais        e[ns]tir
SFX W   0     íais        er[ntv]ir
SFX W   0     íais        eunir
SFX W   0     íais        [io]rir
SFX W   0     íais        ormir
SFX W   0     íais        ucir
SFX W   0     íais        [üu]ir
SFX W   0     íais        ullir
SFX W   0     íais        uñir
SFX W   0     ían         ar
SFX W   er    rían        aber
SFX W   0     ían         [^fh]acer
SFX W   cer   rían        [fh]acer
SFX W   er    drían       aler
SFX W   0     ían         [aeo]er
SFX W   0     ían         e[cd]er
SFX W   0     ían         ender
SFX W   er    drían       [eo]ner
SFX W   0     ían         er[dnt]er
SFX W   er    rían        erer
SFX W   0     ían         o[clv]er
SFX W   er    rían        oder
SFX W   0     ían         olver
SFX W   0     ían         or[cd]er
SFX W   ir    drían       alir
SFX W   0     ían         e[bdgmrtñ]ir
SFX W   ecir  irían       ecir
SFX W   ír    irían       [eo]ír
SFX W   0     ían         enchir
SFX W   0     ían         endir
SFX W   ir    drían       enir
SFX W   0     ían         e[ns]tir
SFX W   0     ían         er[ntv]ir
SFX W   0     ían         eunir
SFX W   0     ían         [io]rir
SFX W   0     ían         ormir
SFX W   0     ían         ucir
SFX W   0     ían         [üu]ir
SFX W   0     ían         ullir
SFX W   0     ían         uñir
SFX W   iar   íe          iar
SFX W   ebrar iebre       ebrar
SFX W   edrar iedre       edrar
SFX W   egar  iegue       egar
SFX W   elar  iele        elar
SFX W   evar  ieve        evar
SFX W   emblar iemble      emblar
SFX W   embrar iembre      embrar
SFX W   ar    e           andar
SFX W   endar iende       endar
SFX W   endrar iendre      endrar
SFX W   engar iengue      engar
SFX W   ensar iense       ensar
SFX W   entar iente       entar
SFX W   enzar ience       enzar
SFX W   erbar ierbe       erbar
SFX W   ernar ierne       ernar
SFX W   errar ierre       errar
SFX W   ertar ierte       ertar
SFX W   esar  iese        esar
SFX W   estar ieste       estar
SFX W   etar  iete        etar
SFX W   ezar  iece        ezar
SFX W   ijar  íje         [ae]hijar
SFX W   ilar  íle         [ae]hilar
SFX W   inar  íne         [aeo]hinar
SFX W   itar  íte         [ae]hitar
SFX W   umar  úme         [ae]humar
SFX W   usar  úse         [ae]husar
SFX W   izar  íce         [ae]izar
SFX W   onzar üence       gonzar
SFX W   uar   úe          [^g]uar
SFX W   uar   üe          guar
SFX W   obar  uebe        obar
SFX W   oblar ueble       oblar
SFX W   ocar  ueque       ocar
SFX W   odar  uede        odar
SFX W   ogar  uegue       ogar
SFX W   olar  uele        olar
SFX W   ollar uelle       [^g]ollar
SFX W   oldar üelde       goldar
SFX W   oldar uelde       [^g]oldar
SFX W   ollar üelle       gollar
SFX W   olcar uelque      olcar
SFX W   olgar uelgue      olgar
SFX W   oltar uelte       oltar
SFX W   onar  uene        onar
SFX W   oñar  ueñe        oñar
SFX W   ontar uente       ontar
SFX W   ontrar uentre      ontrar
SFX W   orar  uere        [^g]orar
SFX W   orar  üere        gorar
SFX W   orcar uerque      orcar
SFX W   ordar uerde       ordar
SFX W   ornar uerne       ornar
SFX W   ortar uerte       ortar
SFX W   orzar uerce       orzar
SFX W   osar  uese        osar
SFX W   ostar ueste       ostar
SFX W   ostrar uestre      ostrar
SFX W   ovar  ueve        ovar
SFX W   gar   egue        ugar
SFX W   cer   zca         [^fh]acer
SFX W   cer   ga          [fh]acer
SFX W   er    ga          aler
SFX W   er    iga         aer
SFX W   caber quepa       caber
SFX W   cer   zca         ecer
SFX W   eder  ieda        eder
SFX W   er    a           [eo]er
SFX W   er    iga         oer
SFX W   er    ya          oer
SFX W   ender ienda       ender
SFX W   er    ga          [eo]ner
SFX W   erder ierda       erder
SFX W   erer  iera        erer
SFX W   erner ierna       erner
SFX W   erter ierta       erter
SFX W   ocer  ueza        cocer
SFX W   cer   zca         [^c]ocer
SFX W   oder  ueda        oder
SFX W   oler  uela        oler
SFX W   olver uelva       olver
SFX W   orcer uerza       orcer
SFX W   order uerda       order
SFX W   over  ueva        over
SFX W   aber  epa         saber
SFX W   ir    ga          alir
SFX W   ebir  iba         ebir
SFX W   ecir  iga         ecir
SFX W   edir  ida         edir
SFX W   egir  ija         egir
SFX W   emir  ima         emir
SFX W   eír   ía          eír
SFX W   eñir  iña         eñir
SFX W   eguir iga         eguir
SFX W   enchir incha       enchir
SFX W   endir inda        endir
SFX W   enir  enga        enir
SFX W   entir ienta       entir
SFX W   erir  iera        erir
SFX W   ernir ierna       ernir
SFX W   ertir ierta       ertir
SFX W   ervir irva        [^h]ervir
SFX W   estir ista        estir
SFX W   etir  ita         etir
SFX W   unir  úna         eunir
SFX W   ervir ierva       hervir
SFX W   irir  iera        irir
SFX W   ibir  íba         ohibir
SFX W   ír    iga         oír
SFX W   orir  uera        orir
SFX W   ormir uerma       ormir
SFX W   cir   zca         ucir
SFX W   ir    ya          [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uya         güir
SFX W   ir    a           ullir
SFX W   ir    a           uñir
SFX W   iar   íes         iar
SFX W   ebrar iebres      ebrar
SFX W   edrar iedres      edrar
SFX W   egar  iegues      egar
SFX W   elar  ieles       elar
SFX W   evar  ieves       evar
SFX W   emblar iembles     emblar
SFX W   embrar iembres     embrar
SFX W   ar    es          andar
SFX W   endar iendes      endar
SFX W   endrar iendres     endrar
SFX W   engar iengues     engar
SFX W   ensar ienses      ensar
SFX W   entar ientes      entar
SFX W   enzar iences      enzar
SFX W   erbar ierbes      erbar
